Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2678.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-16-26 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-16 entitled "Teachers’
Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-16-26. Spouse’s, former spouse divorced, or domestic partner’s benefits.
(a) Spouse’s, former spouse divorced, and domestic partner’s benefits are payable
following the decease of a member as provided in §§ 16-16-25 — 16-16-38.
(b) The spouse, former spouse divorced, or domestic partner shall be entitled to benefits
upon attaining the age of sixty (60) years.
(c) The spouse, former spouse divorced, or domestic partner was living with the deceased
member at the time of the member’s death. A spouse, former spouse divorced, or domestic partner
is deemed to have been living with the deceased member if they were both members of the same
household on the date of the deceased member’s death, or the spouse, former spouse divorced, or
domestic partner was receiving contributions from the deceased member toward support on that
date, or the deceased member had been ordered by a court to contribute to the spouse’s, former
spouse divorced, or domestic partner’s support.
(d) Remarriage of the spouse, former spouse divorced, or domestic partner or establishment
of a domestic partnership shall render the person ineligible to receive current or future benefits
under this section.
(e) The spouse or domestic partner of a member, as defined in this section, shall be entitled

to monthly benefits payable in accordance with the following table:
Spouse's or Domestic
Highest Annual Partner's Monthly
Salary Minimum Benefit
$17,000 or less $825 $1,025
$17,001 to $25,000 $963 $1,200
$25,001 to $33,000 $1,100 $1,375
$33,001 to $40,000 $1,238 $1,550
$40,001 and over $1,375 $1,725
(f) The former spouse divorced shall be entitled to monthly benefits, payable in accordance
with the table provided in subsection (e) of this section, only if there are no dependent children,
parents, or other spouse or domestic partner entitled to benefits.
(g) A yearly adjustment of the base benefit, and a yearly cost-of-living adjustment for
spouse’s, former spouse divorced, or domestic partner’s benefits shall be based on the annual social
security adjustment.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005838
========
LC005838 - Page 2 of 3